West Virginia, session 2026, SB70.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: Article 34. Data Protection Act. §5-34-1. Definitions. (a) "State agency" means an association, authority, board, department, commission, independent agency, institution, system, office, society, or other body in state government created or authorized to be created by the Constitution of West Virginia or any law.(b) "Foreign country of concern" means foreign adversaries, as designated by 15 C.F.R. § 791.4. §5-34-2. Ban. (a) All officials, employees, or contractors of any state agency, other than a law enforcement officer, as defined in §15-2-25B(j), for law enforcement purposes, shall prohibit the following on any state-owned or state-leased device capable of accessing the internet:(1) The download and/or use of any social media application, channel, or platform that is owned by an entity in a foreign country of concern; and(2) Accessing the website of any social media application, channel, or platform that is owned by an entity in a foreign country of concern.(b) All officials, employees, or contractors of a state agency, other than a law enforcement officer for law enforcement purposes, are prohibited from using applications, software, and artificial intelligence algorithms that are owned by an entity located in a foreign country of concern.(c) The ban imposed by this section does not apply to officials, employees, or contractors of a state agency who have obtained a written waiver from the Secretary of State for purposes of and limited to the performance of their duties.